Utah statutes.
58-28-307.   Exemptions from chapter.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307 this chapter
does not apply to:
(1)  any person who practices veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry upon
any animal owned by him, and the employee of that person when the practice is
upon an animal owned by his employer, and incidental to his employment,
except:
(a)  this exemption does not apply to any person, or his employee, when the
ownership of an animal was acquired for the purpose of circumventing this
chapter; and
(b)  this exemption does not apply to the administration, dispensing, or
prescribing of a prescription drug, or nonprescription drug intended for off
label use, unless the administration, dispensing, or prescribing of the drug
is obtained through an existing veterinarian-patient relationship;
(2)  any person who as a student at a veterinary college approved by the board
engages in the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry as part
of his academic training and under the direct supervision and control of a
licensed veterinarian, if that practice is during the last two years of the
college course of instruction and does not exceed an 18-month duration;
(3)  a veterinarian who is an officer or employee of the government of the
United States, or the state, or its political subdivisions, and technicians
under his supervision, while engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine,
surgery, or dentistry for that government;
(4)  any person while engaged in the vaccination of poultry, pullorum testing,
typhoid testing of poultry, and related poultry disease control activity;
(5)  any person who is engaged in bona fide and legitimate medical, dental,
pharmaceutical, or other scientific research, if that practice of veterinary
medicine, surgery, or dentistry is directly related to, and a necessary part
of, that research;
(6)  veterinarians licensed under the laws of another state rendering
professional services in association with licensed veterinarians of this state
for a period not to exceed 90 days;
(7)  registered pharmacists of this state engaged in the sale of veterinary
supplies, instruments, and medicines, if the sale is at his regular place of
business;
(8)  any person in this state engaged in the sale of veterinary supplies,
instruments, and medicines, except prescription drugs which must be sold in
compliance with state and federal regulations, if the supplies, instruments,
and medicines are sold in original packages bearing adequate identification
and directions for application and administration and the sale is made in the
regular course of, and at the regular place of business;
(9)  any person rendering emergency first aid to animals in those areas where
a licensed veterinarian is not available, and if suspicious reportable
diseases are reported immediately to the state veterinarian;
(10)  any person performing or teaching nonsurgical bovine artificial
insemination;
(11)  any person affiliated with an institution of higher education who
teaches nonsurgical bovine embryo transfer or any technician trained by or
approved by an institution of higher education who performs nonsurgical bovine
embryo transfer, but only if any prescription drug used in the procedure is
prescribed and administered under the direction of a veterinarian licensed to
practice in Utah;
(12) (a)  upon written referral by a licensed veterinarian, the practice of
animal chiropractic by a chiropractic physician licensed under Chapter 73,
Chiropractic Physician Practice Act, who has completed an animal chiropractic
course approved by the American Veterinary Chiropractic Association or the
division;
(b)  upon written referral by a licensed veterinarian, the practice of animal
physical therapy by a physical therapist licensed under Chapter 24b, Physical
Therapy Practice Act, who has completed at least 100 hours of animal physical
therapy training, including quadruped anatomy and hands-on training, approved
by the division;
(c)  upon written referral by a licensed veterinarian, the practice of animal
massage therapy by a massage therapist licensed under Chapter 47b, Massage
Therapy Practice Act, who has completed at least 60 hours of animal massage
therapy training, including quadruped anatomy and hands-on training, approved
by the division; and
(d)  upon written referral by a licensed veterinarian, the practice of
acupuncture by an acupuncturist licensed under Chapter 72, Acupuncture
Licensing Act, who has completed a course of study on animal acupuncture
approved by the division;
(13)  unlicensed assistive personnel performing duties appropriately delegated
to the unlicensed assistive personnel in accordance with Section 58-28-502;
(14)  an animal shelter employee who is:
(a)  acting under the indirect supervision of a licensed veterinarian; and
(b)  performing animal euthanasia in the course and scope of employment; and
(15)  an individual providing appropriate training for animals, however, this
exception does not include diagnosing any medical condition, or prescribing or
dispensing any prescription drugs or therapeutics.
